Tennessee, session 114, HB0464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-156(b), is amended by deleting
the language "This immunity from being arrested, charged, or prosecuted shall apply to the
person experiencing a drug overdose on the person's first such drug overdose. This immunity
from being arrested, charged, or prosecuted may be applied if the person experiences
subsequent drug overdoses at the discretion of the responding law enforcement officer or the
district attorney general's office.".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0464
002191
- 1 -